District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-1045

Pleading.

Repealed.

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 46, 41 DCR 3010
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-1045.
1981 Ed., § 29-1345.

Prior Codifications